Florida, session 2026, HB4081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Effective upon approval by a majority vote of
those qualified electors as provided in section 4 of this act,
section 2 of section 2 of chapter 2023-7, Laws of Florida, is
amended to read:
Section 2. Boundaries.—The Eastpoint Water and Sewer
District shall include all that portion of Eastpoint in said
county described as follows:

All of Sections 15, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 28, and
Section 30 and all of Fractional Sections 27, 29, 31,
and 32 in Township 8 South, Range 6 West; All of
Fractional Sections 25 and 36 in Township 8 South,
Range 7 West; All of Fractional Section 1 in Township
9 South, Range 7 West; and all of Fractional Section 6
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4081 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4081 2026 Legislature
in Township 9 South, Range 6 West.

Section 2. Effective upon approval by a majority vote of
those qualified electors as provided in section 5 of this act,
section 2 of section 2 of chapter 2023-7, Laws of Florida, is
amended to read:
Section 2. Boundaries.—The Eastpoint Water and Sewer
District shall include all that portion of Eastpoint in said
county described as follows:

All of Section 30 and all of Fractional Sections 29,
31, and 32 in Township 8 South, Range 6 West; All of
Fractional Sections 25 and 36 in Township 8 South,
Range 7 West; All of Fractional Section 1 in Township
9 South, Range 7 West; and all of Fractional Section 6
in Township 9 South, Range 6 West.

AND

All of St. George Island.

Section 3. Subsection (19) is added to section 8 of
section 2 of chapter 2023-7, Laws of Florida, to read:
Section 8. Powers of board.— The board may:
(19) Inspect septic tanks within the district to ensure
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4081 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4081 2026 Legislature
the septic tanks are being operated in compliance with
applicable permits and provide reasonable penalties for
violations.
Section 4. Referendum election.—
(1) A referendum of those qualified electors within the
area proposed to be annexed into the district as described in
section 1 of this act shall be held on November 3, 2026,
concurrent with the 2026 general election.
(2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
in substantially the following form:
"EXPANDING BOUNDARIES OF THE EASTPOINT WATER AND SEWER
DISTRICT."
(3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
in substantially the following form:
Shall section 1 of Chapter 2026-___, Laws of Florida,
amending the charter of the Eastpoint Water and Sewer
District, Franklin County, to expand the boundaries of the
district to contain the lands described therein, become
effective?

( ) YES.
( ) NO.

(4) The referendum shall be conducted by the Supervisor of
Elections of Franklin County in accordance with the Florida
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4081 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4081 2026 Legislature
Election Code.
Section 5. Referendum election.—
(1) A referendum of those qualified electors within the
area proposed to be annexed into the district as described in
section 2 of this act shall be held at the first general
election after the district reaches an irrevocable agreement to
acquire the water utility serving St. George Island by the
Eastpoint Water and Sewer District, unless the acquisition
occurs within 120 days before a general election, in which case
such referendum shall be held at the second general election
after the acquisition.
(2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
in substantially the following form:
"EXPANDING BOUNDARIES OF THE EASTPOINT WATER AND SEWER
DISTRICT."
(3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
in substantially the following form:
Shall section 2 of Chapter 2026-___, Laws of Florida,
amending the charter of the Eastpoint Water and Sewer
District, Franklin County, to expand the boundaries of the
district to contain the lands described therein, become
effective?

( ) YES.
100 ( ) NO.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4081 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4081 2026 Legislature
101
102 (4) The referendum shall be conducted by the Supervisor of
103 Elections of Franklin County in accordance with the Florida
104 Election Code.
105 Section 6. If the amendments to chapter 2023-7, Laws of
106 Florida, by sections 1 and 2 of this act are both approved by
107 qualified electors as provided in sections 4 and 5 of this act,
108 both amendments to chapter 2023-7, Laws of Florida, shall be
109 given full effect.
110 Section 7. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
111 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4081 -01-er